Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4413
Psychotropic medication; administration after refusal; conditions.

If a principal with an irrevocable advance mental health care directive consenting to inpatient treatment refuses psychotropic medication through words or actions, psychotropic medication may only be administered by or under the immediate direction of a licensed psychiatrist, and only if:

(1) The principal expressly consented to psychotropic medication in the principal's irrevocable directive;

(2) The principal's attorney in fact, if the principal has an attorney in fact, consents to psychotropic medication; and

(3) Two of the following health care professionals recommend, in writing, treatment with the specific psychotropic medication: A licensed psychiatrist, physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse or any other health care professional licensed to diagnose illnesses and prescribe drugs for mental health care.

Laws 2020, LB247, § 13.